pt-PT: Design de copo de profilaxia: Pincel; Canelado; Teia; Outro
cs: Design profylaktického kalíšku: Štětec; S žebrováním; Síťovaný; Jiné
zh-TW: 抛光杯設計: 畫筆; 羅紋; 網狀; 其他
ru: Конструкция профилактической чаши: Щетка; Ребристая; Перепончатая; Другой
es: Diseño de copa de pulido: Pincel; Acanalado; Con aletas; Otros
lt-LT: Poliravimo gumelės dizainas: Šepetėlis; Briaunota; Rantyta; Kita
sl-SI: Dizajn gumice prophy: Krtačna; Rebrast; Mrežasta; Drugo
tr: Profilaksi Kabı Tasarımı: Fırça; Fitilli; Perdeli; Diğer
en: Prophy cup design: Brush; Ribbed; Webbed; Other
sv: Design på profylaxkopp: Borste; Ribbad; Simhud; Övrigt
sk-SK: Profylaktický dizajn pohára: Štetec; Vrúbkovaný; So západkou; Iné
zh-CN: 洁牙杯设计: 刷子; 带状; 蹼状; 其他
nl: Prophy cup-ontwerp: Borstel; Geribbeld; Met vliezen; Andere
hu: Polírozó kehely kialakítása: Ecset; Bordázott; Hálós; Egyéb
de: Prophy-Cup-Design: Bürste; Gerippt; Gewebeartig; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Design cupa de profilaxie: Perie; Cu nervuri; Cu striuri interne; Altele
fr: Design de la Prophy-Cup: Brosse; Nervuré; Palmé; Autre
ja: プロフィーカップデザイン: ブラシ; リブ付き; ウェブ付き; その他
th: การออกแบบหัวขัดทำความสะอาดฟัน: แปรง; แบบร่อง; เป็นพังผืด; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Дизайн на чашки за полиране: Четка; Оребрена; Мрежеста; Други
it: Forma della coppetta per profilassi: Pennello; A coste; Palmato; Altro
el: Σχεδιασμός κυπελλοειδών προφύλαξης: Βούρτσα; Ριγέ; Δικτυωτό; Άλλο
nb: Prophy-koppdesign: Børste; Med riller; Nettformet; Annet
ko: 프로피 컵 디자인: 브러시; 골이 있는; 물갈퀴; 기타
pt-BR: Formato do copo profilático: Pincel; Com nervuras; Teia; Outro
da: Profy Cup-design: Børste; Med riller; Med net; Andet
fi: Ennaltaehkäisevä lääkemittasuunnittelu: Sivellin; Joustinneuleinen; Verkkomainen; Muu
hr-HR: Čašice za profilaksu: Četkica; Rebrasta; Mrežasta; Ostalo
vi: Loại đài cao su đánh bóng: Cọ; Có gân; Có màng; Khác
pl: Konstrukcja gumek polerskich: Pędzel; Żebrowany; Pas parciany; Inne